Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 41 Theft, Embezzlement, False Pretenses, and Misappropriation
11-41-25.1.
Theft of motor fuel.

Every person who shall leave the premises of a retail motor fuel dealer without paying said dealer for fuel taken shall be guilty of larceny. Any person convicted of violating this section, and the retail value of the fuel taken was five hundred dollars ($500) or less, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or both. Any person convicted of violating this section, and the retail value of the fuel taken exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 439, § 1.

11-41-26.
Two-way mirrors and video cameras in retail store’s dressing rooms prohibited.

No person who owns or operates a retail mercantile establishment as defined in §

11-41-20(a)(6)

which sells clothing to the public shall maintain in any dressing room on the premises any two-way mirror or electronic video camera or any similar device capable of filming or projecting an image of a person inside the dressing room or booth. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 316, § 1.

11-41-27.
Wrongful conversion by officer or state or municipal employee.

Whoever, being an officer or employee of the state of Rhode Island, or any department, agency, instrumentality or political subdivision of the state, or any city or town, embezzles or wrongfully converts to his or her own use or benefit, or to the use or benefit of any other, any money or property which comes into his or her possession or control in the execution of that office or employment, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or three (3) times the value of the money or property thus embezzled or converted, whichever is greater, or imprisoned not more than twenty (20) years, or both; except that if the sum or value of the property embezzled is less than one hundred dollars ($100) he or she shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 153, § 1.

11-41-28.
Civil restitution for shoplifting.

An adult or emancipated minor who commits or attempts to commit a larceny of goods for sale on the premises of a merchant as set forth in §

11-41-20

shall be civilly liable to the merchant in an amount consisting of:

Not more than the retail value of the merchandise if not recovered in merchantable condition; plus

A penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100); plus

Court costs.

A store employee shall be liable in a civil action for larceny of goods for sale on the premises of his or her merchant employer and for larceny of cash from the merchant. The civil liability to the merchant shall be in the amount consisting of:

Not more than the value of the goods or cash; plus

A penalty assessed of not more than one hundred dollars ($100); plus

Court costs.

A conviction or a plea of guilty to the offense of shoplifting is not a prerequisite to the bringing of a civil suit, obtaining a judgment, or collecting that judgment under this section.

The fact that a merchant may bring action against an individual as provided in this section shall not limit the right of the merchant to demand, orally or in writing, that a person who is liable for damages and penalties under this section remit the damages prior to the consideration of the commencement of any legal action.

An action for recovery of damages and penalties under this section may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction, including the small claims court of a district court, if the total damages do not exceed the jurisdictional limit of the small claims court.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit or limit any other course of action permitted by law which a merchant may have against a person who unlawfully takes merchandise from the merchant’s premise.

If the person to whom a written demand is made complies with the demand within twenty (20) days after the receipt of the demand, that person shall be given a written release from further civil liability with respect to the specific act of retail theft; provided, that written demand shall not include penalties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 576, § 1.

11-41-29.
Insurance fraud — Prohibited activities.

When used in this section:

“Insurer” means, but is not limited to, an authorized insurer, self-insurer, re-insurer, broker, producer, or any agent of them.

“Larceny” means the crime of larceny established in this chapter and by common law, including the requirement of specific intent.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, firm, corporation, or any other legal entity.

“Statement” means, but is not limited to, any written notice, statement, proof of loss, bill of lading, receipt for payment, invoice, account, estimate of property damages, bills for services, diagnosis, prescription, hospital or doctor records, x-rays, test result or other evidence of loss, injury or expense.

Every person who, with the intent to deceive, prepares or assists, abets, or solicits another to prepare or make any written statement that is intended to be presented to any insurer in connection with, or in support of, any application for the issuance of an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains any false information material to the application, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a period of not more than one year, or both.

Every person who, with the intent to deceive, prepares or assists, abets, or solicits another to prepare or make any written statement, including computer-generated documents, that is intended to be presented to any insurer in connection with, or in support of, any claim for payment or other benefit pursuant to an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains any false information material to the claim, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a period of not more than one year, or both.

Every person who, with the intent to deceive, presents or causes to be presented to any insurer any written statement, including computer-generated documents, as part of or in support of a claim for payment or other benefit pursuant to an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains false information material to the claim, shall be deemed guilty of larceny.

Every person who, with the intent to deceive, presents or causes to be presented to any claimant any written statement, including computer-generated documents, as part of or in support of its contest of any claim for payment or other benefit pursuant to an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains any false information material to the claim, shall be deemed guilty of larceny.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 350, § 1.

11-41-30.
Fraud as to health insurer.

Every person who shall obtain health care services from a provider of those services by any false pretense or pretenses with intent to cheat or defraud a health care services insurer or a service corporation organized under chapters 18, 19, 20, 20.1, 20.2 or 41 of title 27 shall be deemed guilty of larceny.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 263, § 1.

11-41-31.
Pension revocation.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person who is convicted or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to any offense, and the offense is related to his or her public office of employment pursuant to §

36-10.1-2

, the judge, as part of any sentence imposed, may revoke or reduce any retirement or any benefit or payment to which the public official or public employee is otherwise entitled under titles 36, 16, 45, and 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31 or under chapter 28 of title 42.

In determining whether the retirement or other benefit shall be revoked or reduced the court shall consider and make a finding on the following factors:

The fact that the allowance of retirement or other benefits or payments for service under this title, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, and under chapter 28 of title 42 presumes and requires that the service shall have been honorably rendered;

The severity of the crime related to public office or public employment of which the public official or public employee has been convicted or to which the public official or public employee has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere;

The amount of monetary loss suffered by the public official’s or public employee’s employer or by any other person as a result of the subject crime related to public office or public employment;

The degree of public trust reposed in the subject public official or public employee by virtue of his or her public office or public employment; and

Any other factors that, in the judgment of the superior court, justice may require.

If the superior court determines that the retirement or other benefits or payments of a public official or public employee should be revoked or reduced under this chapter, it may, in its discretion and after taking into consideration the status of the pension as marital property and the financial needs and resources of any innocent spouse, dependent and/or designated beneficiaries of the public official or public employee, order that some or all of the revoked or reduced benefits or payments be paid to any innocent spouse, dependent or beneficiary as justice may require.

If the court determines that the retirement or other benefits or payments of a public official or public employee should not be revoked or reduced under this chapter, it shall order that the retirement or other benefits or payments be made to the public official or public employee.

Prior to revoking or reducing the benefit, the court shall order a pre-sentence report pursuant to §

12-19-6

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an innocent party from notifying the court by motion of an interest in the pension benefit.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract or life insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 5.

11-41-32.
Theft of historic stone walls.

This section shall be known as the “Leona Kelley Act.”

“Property”, as defined in §

11-41-1

, includes an historic stone wall as defined in subsection (c) of this section, and any person convicted of the theft of an historic stone wall, or portions of a wall, shall be subject to the penalties for larceny as provided in §

11-41-5

.

For the purposes of this chapter, “historic stone wall” is defined as a vertical structure of aligned natural stone, originally constructed in the 17th, 18th, 19th or 20th centuries, to designate a property boundary between farmsteads or to segregate agricultural activities with a single farmstead or to designate property lines. This definition includes new stone walls which closely approximate the appearance of adjoining stone walls with respect to coursing, stone type, joint width, construction and distribution of stones by size.

Anyone convicted of the larceny of an historic stone wall, or portions of a wall, or convicted of attempt to commit larceny, shall be civilly liable to the property owner for the cost of replacing the stones and any other compensable damages related to the larceny.

Any person who makes any plea to a charge under this section, or any person found guilty or convicted under this section, may be ordered to make restitution as a part of his or her sentence and/or disposition. That restitution shall include, but not be limited to, the value of the historic stone wall or portions of it, the reasonable value of any labor and other materials necessary to repair and/or return the wall to the condition it was in prior to the theft, and any other reasonable expenses that, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, are necessary to do justice in disposing of the case. This section is in addition to any other sanctions a sentencing judge may impose in his or her discretion.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 251, § 1.

11-41-33.
Larceny of farm products.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Farm product” means goods used in a farming operation, including, but not limited to:

Crops grown, growing, or to be grown, including, but not limited to, crops produced on trees, vines, and bushes, aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations, and horticultural and forestry products;

Livestock, born or unborn, including aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;

Supplies used or produced in a farming operation; or

Products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured states.

“Farming operation” means the commercial raising, cultivating, propagating, fattening, grazing, or any other farming, livestock, or aquacultural, horticultural or forestry operation, whereby the operation is eligible to be classified as a farm pursuant to the provisions of chapter 27 of title 44.

“Value” means credible evidence that establishes the worth of the farm product on the day of the theft in comparison with a farm product of the same variety and weight.

It shall be unlawful for any person to steal a farm product that is the property of a farming operation, from the farm itself, or the place where the farm product is sold.

Any person found in violation of this section shall be guilty of a felony if the wholesale value of the farm product is two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) or more, and, upon conviction, shall be subject to imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Any person found in violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the wholesale value of the farm product is less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) and, upon conviction, shall be subject to imprisonment of no more than one year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 166, § 1.

11-41-34.
Fraud against the department of human services.

The following establishments and/or retail outlets are prohibited from accepting electronic benefit transfer cards issued by the department of human services:

Liquor stores;

Casinos or at facilities that conduct casino gaming as defined in chapter 61.2 of title 42;

Gambling facilities as defined by chapter 9 of title 41;

Retail establishments that provide adult-oriented entertainment in which performers disrobe or perform in an unclothed state for entertainment as defined in the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 608(a).

A store owner who knowingly allows a prohibited, electronic-benefit transaction in violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for a first offense; by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a second offense; and for a third, or subsequent, offense shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

In addition to the penalties imposed by subsection (b), the department of human services is further authorized to suspend and/or revoke any license necessary to conduct business.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 377, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 499, § 2.